Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-724
Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission; created; members; appointment; administration.

(1) There is hereby created a Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission, which shall consist of seven members, six of whom shall be appointed by the Governor. The Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society shall be the seventh member of the commission and shall serve as secretary of the commission. The Governor shall appoint no more than three members of the commission from the same political party. The Governor shall consider gender and ethnic diversity and the person's appreciation for the history and culture of the state when making the appointments. In making the initial appointments of the commission, the Governor shall appoint two members for a term of two years, two members for a term of four years, and two members for a term of six years. As the terms of the members expire, the Governor shall appoint or reappoint a member of the commission for a term of six years to succeed the member whose term expires. The members shall serve without compensation. The Governor shall be an ex officio member of the commission.

(2) The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be responsible for the administration of the Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission.

Laws 1961, c. 355, § 1, p. 1118;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 37, § 1.